Tennessee statutes. Title 58 Military Affairs, Emergencies and Civil Defense
Part 1 General Emergency Provisions
58-2-107. Emergency management powers of the governor.

The governor is responsible for addressing the dangers presented to this state and its people by emergencies. In the event of an emergency beyond local control, the governor, or, in the governor's absence, the governor's successor as provided by law, may assume direct operational control over all or any part of the emergency management functions within this state, and such person has the power through proper process of law to carry out this chapter. The governor is authorized to delegate such powers as the governor may deem prudent.

Pursuant to the authority vested in the governor under subdivision (a) (1), the governor may issue executive orders, proclamations, and rules and may amend or rescind them. Such executive orders, proclamations, and rules have the force and effect of law.

The governor or the governor's designee, shall declare a state of emergency or a disaster declaration in one (1) of two (2) ways:

By executive order or proclamation; or

By the activation of the TEMP.

These two (2) types of threats may be declared by the governor if the governor finds an emergency has occurred or the occurrence of threat thereof is imminent. The state of emergency shall continue until the governor finds that the threat or danger has been dealt with to the extent that the emergency conditions no longer exist and the governor terminates the state of emergency by executive order or proclamation, but no state of emergency may continue for longer than sixty (60) days unless renewed by the governor. All executive orders or proclamations issued under this section shall indicate the nature of the emergency, the area or areas threatened, and the conditions which have brought the emergency about or which make possible its termination. An executive order or proclamation shall be promptly disseminated by means calculated to bring its contents to the attention of the general public; and, unless the circumstances attendant upon the emergency prevent or impede such filing, the order or proclamation shall be filed promptly with the department of state and in the office of the chief executive officer in each county to which the order or proclamation applies.

An executive order or proclamation of a state of emergency shall:

Activate the emergency mitigation, response, and recovery aspects of the state, local, and interjurisdictional emergency management plans applicable to the political subdivision or area in question;

Be authority for the deployment and use of any forces to which the plan or plans apply and for the use or distribution of any supplies, equipment, and materials and facilities assembled, stockpiled, or arranged to be made available pursuant to this chapter or any other law relating to emergencies; and

Identify whether the state of emergency is due to a minor, major, or catastrophic disaster.

During the continuance of a state emergency, the governor is commander in chief of the Tennessee national guard and of all other forces available for emergency duty. To the greatest extent practicable, the governor shall delegate or assign command authority by prior arrangement embodied in appropriate executive orders or rules, but nothing in this section restricts the governor's authority to do so by orders issued at the time of the emergency.

In addition to any other powers conferred upon the governor by law, the governor may:

Suspend any law, order, rule or regulation prescribing the procedures for conduct of state business or the orders or rules or regulations of any state agency, if strict compliance with any such law, order, rule, or regulation would in any way prevent, hinder, or delay necessary action in coping with the emergency;

Utilize all available resources of the state government and of each political subdivision of the state, as reasonably necessary to cope with the emergency;

Transfer the direction, personnel, or functions of state departments and agencies or units thereof for the purpose of performing or facilitating emergency services;

Subject to any applicable requirements for compensation, commandeer or utilize any private property, which term shall not be construed to include firearms, ammunition, or firearm or ammunition components, if the governor finds this necessary to cope with the emergency;

Direct and compel the evacuation of all or part of the population from any stricken or threatened area within the state if the governor deems this action necessary for the preservation of life or other emergency mitigation, response, or recovery;

Prescribe routes, modes of transportation, and destinations in connection with evacuation;

Control ingress and egress to and from an emergency area, the movement of persons within the area, and the occupancy of premises therein;

Suspend or limit the sale, dispensing, or transportation of alcoholic beverages, explosives, or combustibles, which terms shall not be construed to include firearms, ammunition, or firearm or ammunition components;

Make provision for the availability and use of temporary emergency housing;

Take effective measures for limiting or suspending lighting devices and appliances, gas and water mains, electric power distribution, and all other utility services in the general public interest;

Take measures concerning the conduct of civilians, the movement and cessation of movement of pedestrian and vehicular traffic prior to, during, and subsequent to drills and actual or threatened emergencies, the calling of public meetings and gatherings, and the evacuation and reception of civilian population, as provided in the TEMP and political subdivisions thereof; and

Authorize the use of forces already mobilized as the result of an executive order, rule, or proclamation to assist the private citizens of the state in clean up and recovery operations during emergencies when proper permission to enter onto or into private property has been obtained from the property owner.

The governor shall take such action and give such direction to state and local law enforcement officers and agencies as may be reasonable and necessary for the purpose of securing compliance with this chapter and with the orders and rules made pursuant thereto.

The governor shall employ such measures and give such directions to the department of health and department of human services, division of vocational rehabilitation, as may be reasonable and necessary for the purpose of securing compliance with this chapter or with the findings or recommendations of such agency by reason of conditions arising from emergencies or threats of emergency.

The governor shall delegate emergency responsibilities to the officers and agencies of the state and of the political subdivisions thereof prior to an emergency or threat of an emergency, and shall utilize the services and facilities of existing officers and agencies of the state and of the political subdivisions thereof, including their personnel and other resources, as the primary emergency management forces of the state, and all such officers and agencies shall cooperate with and extend their services and facilities to the agency, as it may require.

The governor and the agency shall establish agencies and offices and appoint executive, professional, technical, clerical and other personnel as may be necessary to carry out this chapter.

The governor shall formulate and execute plans and rules for the control of traffic in order to provide for the rapid and safe movement or evacuation over public highways and streets of people, troops, or vehicles and materials for national defense or for use in any defense industry, and may coordinate the activities of the departments or agencies of the state and the political subdivisions thereof concerned directly or indirectly with public highways and streets in a manner which will effectuate such plans.

The governor may delegate to the director of TEMA the authority to declare a state of emergency in order that certain commercial vehicles engaged in the distribution of electric power, the supply of fuel, or telecommunications services to residences and businesses may be considered to be participating in an emergency relief effort for the purpose of the federal hours-of-service regulations promulgated by the federal motor carrier safety administration. Pursuant to the delegation of authority granted by this subsection (k), the director of TEMA may declare a state of emergency prospectively in anticipation of an emergency.

If the governor of Tennessee declares an emergency in response to a catastrophic or major disaster, voluntary health care providers, including hospitals and community mental health care centers, participating in the Emergency Management Assistance Compact or Southern Regional Emergency Management Assistance Compact are immune from liability in providing the health care to victims or evacuees of the catastrophic or major disaster, as long as the services are provided within the limits of the provider's license, certification or authorization, unless an act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct.

If additional medical resources are required, the governor, by executive order, may provide limited liability protection to health care providers, including hospitals and community mental health care centers and those licensed, certified or authorized under titles 33, 63 or 68, and who render services within the limits of their license, certification or authorization to victims or evacuees of such emergencies; provided, however, that this protection may not include any act or omission caused by gross negligence or willful misconduct.

The duration of the protection provided by this subsection (l ) shall not exceed thirty (30) days, but may be extended by the governor by executive order for an additional thirty (30) days, if required to ensure the provision of emergency medical services in response to the catastrophic or major disaster.

During any state of emergency, major disaster or natural disaster, the state, a political subdivision or a public official shall not prohibit nor impose additional restrictions on the lawful possession, transfer, sale, transport, carrying, storage, display or use of firearms and ammunition or firearm and ammunition components.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1; 2004, ch. 487, § 1; 2006, ch. 560, § 1; 2007, ch. 129, § 1; 2010, ch. 885, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority to compel emergency evacuations, OAG 06-172 (11/22/06).

Ability of out-of-state health care professionals to provide emergency assistance in Tennessee, OAG 07-107 (7/13/07).

The General Assembly has vested the Governor with exclusive responsibility and authority to assume control over all aspects of the State's response to an emergency such as the COVID-19 pandemic. Because the executive orders that the Governor issues pursuant to that authority have the force and effect of law, the Governor's directives in response to an emergency supersede and preempt any action taken by political subdivisions of the State. Absent an express delegation of power by the Governor, local governmental entities may not take actions that are either more restrictive or less restrictive with respect to the subjects addressed in the Governor's executive orders governing the State's emergency response to COVID-19. Such action would be at cross purposes with the Governor's orders, which are the law of the State, and would constitute an impermissible legal conflict. Just as the Governor may exercise his authority to delegate to a local governmental entity or to the local health department “such powers as the governor may deem prudent,” the Governor may exercise his emergency powers to expressly authorize, or recognize the authority of, county health departments to take action that may otherwise be inconsistent with his executive orders. Such a delegation of authority may be revoked or modified at any time and, absent an express delegation or authorization by the Governor, the local health department or other local governmental entity may not take any action inconsistent with the Governor's executive orders. OAG 20-07, 2020 Tenn. AG LEXIS 5 (4/27/2020).

58-2-108. Designation of emergency services coordinators.

At the direction of the governor, the head of each executive department and independent agency shall select from within such department or agency a person to be designated as the emergency services coordinator (ESC) for the department or agency together with an alternate ESC.

The ESC is responsible for coordinating with TEMA and reporting to that agency on emergency preparedness issues, preparing and maintaining emergency preparedness and postdisaster response and recovery plans for their agency, maintaining rosters of personnel to assist in disaster operations, and coordinating appropriate training for agency personnel.

These individuals shall be responsible for ensuring that each state facility, such as a prison, office building, or university, has a disaster preparedness plan that is reviewed by the applicable local emergency management agency and approved by TEMA.

The head of each department or agency shall notify TEMA, in writing, of the person initially designated as the ESC for such agency and the ESC's alternate, and of any changes in persons so designated thereafter.

Upon the designation of the ESC, the department or agency shall provide the necessary equipment to the ESC as prescribed by TEMA for the performance of the duties of the ESC.

TEMA shall, in consultation with the department of human resources, develop a mechanism to provide for a salary supplement for the appointed ESC, subject to available funding.

TEMA shall notify the governor of compliance with this section.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

Cross-References. Interstate civil defense and disaster compact, title 58, ch. 2, part 4.

Monitoring of radio-active truck traffic, § 68-202-104.

Natural and nonhostile disasters included in civil defense functions, § 58-2-102.

Office of energy programs, §§ 4-3-510 — 4-3-515.

58-2-109. Financing — Acceptance of gifts.

It is the intent of the general assembly and declared to be the policy of this state that funds to prepare for and meet emergencies shall always be available.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the first recourse shall be to annually fund a state emergency management agency. If the governor finds that the demands placed upon these funds in coping with a particular disaster are unreasonably great, the governor may, as otherwise provided by law, make funds available by transferring and expending moneys appropriated for other purposes or out of any unappropriated surplus funds.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the governor to apply for, administer, and expend any grants, gifts, or payments in aid of emergency prevention, mitigation, preparedness, response, or recovery.

Whenever any person, firm, or corporation offers to the state or to any political subdivision thereof services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant, loan or other agreement for the purpose of emergency management, the state, acting through the agency, or such political subdivision, acting through its governing body or a local emergency management agency, may accept such offer. Upon such acceptance, the agency or the presiding officer of the governing body of the political subdivision may authorize receipt of the gift, grant, or loan on behalf of the state or such political subdivision, subject to the terms of the offer.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

Cross-References. Acceptance of gifts, § 12-1-101.

58-2-110. Emergency management powers of political subdivisions.

Safeguarding the life and property of its citizens is an innate responsibility of the governing body of each political subdivision of the state.

Counties.

In order to provide effective and orderly governmental control and coordination of emergency operations in emergencies within the scope of this chapter, each county within this state shall be within the jurisdiction of and served by TEMA. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, each local emergency management agency shall have jurisdiction over and serve an entire county. Unless part of an interjurisdictional emergency management agreement entered into pursuant to subdivision (3)(b) which is recognized by the governor by executive order or rule, each county must establish and maintain such an emergency management agency and shall develop a county emergency management plan and program that is coordinated and consistent with the TEMP and program.

Each county emergency management agency created and established pursuant to this chapter shall have a director who shall be appointed by the CLEO and, if required, approved by the governing body of the county. The director must meet the minimum training and education qualifications established in a job description developed by the CLEO and that meets the requirements of § 58-2-127. The job description for a directorship must be approved by the governing body of the county. The director's annual salary shall be fixed by the governing body of the county. Each CLEO shall promptly inform TEMA of the appointment of the director and other personnel. Each director has direct responsibility for the organization, administration, and operation of the county emergency management agency, subject only to the direction and control of the CLEO and shall serve as liaison to TEMA and other local emergency management agencies and organizations.

Each county emergency management agency shall perform emergency management functions within the territorial limits of the county within which it is organized and, in addition, shall conduct such activities outside its territorial limits of the county within which it is organized as are required pursuant to this chapter and in accordance with state and county emergency management plans and mutual aid agreements. A county shall serve as liaison for and coordinate the requests of municipalities located within such county for state and federal assistance during postdisaster emergency operations.

Municipalities. Legally constituted municipalities are authorized and encouraged to create municipal emergency management programs. Municipal emergency management programs shall coordinate their activities with those of the county emergency management agency. Municipalities without emergency management programs shall be served by their respective county agencies. If a municipality elects to establish an emergency management program, it must comply with all laws, rules, and regulations applicable to county emergency management agencies. Each municipal emergency management plan must be consistent with and subject to the applicable county emergency management plan. In addition, each municipality must coordinate requests for state or federal emergency response assistance with its county. This requirement does not apply to requests for reimbursement under federal public disaster assistance programs.

Emergency management powers; political subdivisions.

In carrying out this chapter, each political subdivision has the power and authority to:

Appropriate and expend funds; make contracts; obtain and distribute equipment, materials, and supplies for emergency management purposes; provide for the health and safety of persons and property, including emergency assistance to the victims of any emergency; and direct and coordinate the development of emergency management plans and programs in accordance with the policies and plans set by the federal and state emergency management agencies;

Appoint, employ, remove, or provide, with or without compensation, coordinators, rescue teams, fire and police personnel, and other emergency management workers;

Establish, as necessary, a primary and one (1) or more secondary emergency operating centers to provide continuity of government and direction and control of emergency operations;

Assign and make available for duty the offices and agencies of the political subdivision, including the employees, property, or equipment thereof relating to firefighting, engineering, rescue, health, medical and related services, police, transportation, construction, and similar items or services for emergency operation purposes, as the primary emergency management forces of the political subdivision for employment within or outside the political limits of the subdivision;

Request state assistance or invoke emergency-related mutual-aid assistance by declaring a state of local emergency in the event of an emergency affecting only one (1) political subdivision. The duration of each state of emergency declared locally is limited to seven (7) days; it may be extended, as necessary, in seven-day increments. Further, the political subdivision has the power and authority to waive the procedures and formalities otherwise required of the political subdivision by law pertaining to:

Performance of public work and taking whatever prudent action is necessary to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the community;

Entering into contracts;

Incurring obligations;

Employment of permanent and temporary workers;

Utilization of volunteer workers;

Rental of equipment;

Acquisition and distribution, with or without compensation, of supplies, materials, and facilities; and

Appropriation and expenditure of public funds; and

Small or sparse population;

Declare a local state of emergency in order that certain commercial vehicles engaged in the distribution of electric power, the supply of fuel, or telecommunications services to residences and businesses may be considered to be participating in an emergency relief effort for the purpose of the federal hours-of-service regulations promulgated by the federal motor carrier safety administration. The CLEO may declare a local state of emergency prospectively in anticipation of an emergency.

Upon the request of two (2) or more adjoining counties, or if the governor finds that two (2) or more adjoining counties would be better served by an interjurisdictional arrangement than by maintaining separate emergency management agencies and service, the governor may delineate by executive order or rule an interjurisdictional area adequate to plan for, prevent, mitigate, or respond to emergencies in such area and may direct steps to be taken as necessary, including the creation of an interjurisdictional relationship, a joint emergency plan, a provision for mutual aid, or an area organization for emergency planning and services. A finding of the governor pursuant to this subdivision (3)(B) shall be based on one (1) or more factors related to the difficulty of maintaining an efficient and effective emergency prevention, mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery system on a nonjurisdictional basis, such as:

Limitations on public financial resources severe enough to make maintenance of a separate emergency management agency and services unreasonably burdensome;

Unusual vulnerability to emergencies as evidenced by a past history of emergencies, topographical features, drainage characteristics, emergency potential, and presence of emergency-prone facilities or operations;

The interrelated character of the counties in a multicounty area; and

Other relevant conditions or circumstances.

Local emergency planning committees.

Each local emergency planning committee (LEPC) is authorized to assess and collect an annual fee of one hundred dollars ($100) from member facilities and industries within its emergency planning district required to submit tier II reports in accordance with federal law, 42 U.S.C. § 11001 et seq. Such fee shall be assessed and collected in the manner authorized by each such LEPC.

The revenue derived from such fee shall be used solely by the LEPC for conducting annual event exercises, educating the public, and printing the Hazardous Materials Emergency Response Plan.

This subdivision (4) applies to LEPCs in any county having a population of not less than seventy-one thousand, three hundred (71,300) nor more than seventy-one thousand, four hundred (71,400), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, upon the adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body of such county.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1; 2003, ch. 185, § 1; 2004, ch. 487, § 2; 2009, ch. 110, § 1; 2011, ch. 365, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. The director and deputy director of a local emergency management agency created under T.C.A. § 58-2-110 may not display flashing blue lights on their vehicles, OAG 07-74, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 72 (5/17/07).

58-2-111. Possession of mobile telephone by person being housed in camp or shelter.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person being housed in a camp or shelter organized or maintained by the federal or Tennessee emergency management agency or a local emergency management agency, or pursuant to an action taken by such agency, is authorized to possess a mobile telephone.

Acts 2019, ch. 457, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 457, § 2. May 22, 2019.

58-2-112. [Reserved.]

TEMA is authorized to provide, within or out of the state, such support from available personnel, equipment, and other resources of state agencies and the political subdivisions of the state as may be necessary to reinforce emergency management agencies in areas stricken by emergency. Such support shall be rendered with due consideration of the plans of the federal government, this state, the other states, and of the criticalness of the existing situation. Emergency management support forces shall be called to duty upon order of TEMA and shall perform functions in any part of the state or, upon the conditions specified in this section, in other states.

Personnel of emergency management support forces while on duty, whether inside or outside of this state, shall:

If they are employees of the state, have the powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities, and receive the compensation incidental to their employment;

If they are employees of a political subdivision of the state, whether serving inside or outside of the political subdivision, have the powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities, and receive the compensation, incidental to their employment. The compensation shall be provided by and through the providing political subdivision; and

If they are not employees of the state or a political subdivision thereof, they shall be entitled to the same rights and immunities as are provided by law for the employees of this state and to such compensation as may be fixed by TEMA. All personnel of emergency management support forces shall, while on duty, be subject to the operational control of the authority in charge of emergency management activities in the area in which they are serving and shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary travel and subsistence expenses to the extent of funds available.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

Attorney General Opinions. The Tennessee Emergency Management Agency is authorized but not required to compensate disaster recovery volunteers for their services, OAG 04-174 (12/17/04).

The Tennessee Emergency Management Agency is required to register the names of disaster recovery volunteers with the Board of Claims, OAG 04-174 (12/17/04).

Disaster recovery volunteers and the State of Tennessee are immune for the negligent operation of a state vehicle by a volunteer en route to a requesting state under the Compact if traveling to a disaster is considered rendering aid in another state pursuant to T.C.A. § 58-2-403; requesting states are required to provide representation to disaster recovery volunteers to the same extent they provide representation to their own agents, OAG 04-174 (12/17/04).

If not immune pursuant to T.C.A. § 58-2-403, volunteers are immune as provided in T.C.A. § 9-8-307(h) in Tennessee, and the State of Tennessee is liable for their negligence, OAG 04-174 (12/17/04).

Volunteers are entitled to the T.C.A. § 9-8-307 immunity and the State of Tennessee is entitled to sovereign immunity in other states if those states choose to recognize the immunity afforded the State of Tennessee and its volunteers by the State of Tennessee; regardless, if sued personally, volunteers can request legal representation at the expense of the State of Tennessee and reimbursement of any judgment, OAG 04-174 (12/17/04).

Disaster recovery volunteers sent to a Compact state by the Tennessee Emergency Management Agency are not entitled to Tennessee workers' compensation benefits in the event of death or injury, OAG 04-174 (12/17/04).

Legal protection of law enforcement officers who self-deploy in response to disasters, OAG 06-029 (2/8/06).

No remedy other than general tort law is likely available for unpaid volunteers for death or injury sustained while mobilized by TEMA. TEMA's discretionary authority to provide a disaster relief volunteer compensation is not sufficient to classify a disaster relief volunteer as a paid state employee or as a contract vendor of personal services for the State of Tennessee. OAG 12-87, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 88 (9/17/12).

58-2-114. Government equipment, services, and facilities.

In carrying out this chapter, the governor, the director of TEMA and the executive officers, or governing bodies of the political subdivisions of the state establishing local emergency management agencies, are directed to utilize the services, equipment, supplies and facilities of existing departments, offices, and agencies of the state and of the political subdivisions thereof to the maximum extent practicable, and the officers and personnel of all such departments, offices and agencies are directed to cooperate with and extend such services and facilities to the governor or to the director and to the local emergency management agencies throughout the state upon request.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

Cross-References. General eminent domain law, title 29, ch. 16.

58-2-115. Compensation.

Compensation for services or for the taking or use of property shall be owed only to the extent that a claimant may not be deemed to have volunteered the claimant's services or property without compensation and only to the extent that such taking exceeds the legal responsibility of a claimant to render such services or make such property so available.

Compensation owed for personal services shall be only such as may be fixed by TEMA.

Compensation for property shall be owed only if the property was commandeered or otherwise used in coping with an emergency and its use or destruction was ordered by the governor or a member of the emergency forces of this state.

Any person claiming compensation for the use, damage, loss, or destruction of property under this chapter shall file a claim therefor with the agency in the form and manner that the agency provides.

Unless the amount of compensation owed on account of property damaged, lost, or destroyed is agreed between the claimant and TEMA, the amount of compensation shall be calculated in the same manner as compensation due for a taking of property pursuant to the condemnation laws of this state.

Nothing in this section applies to or authorizes compensation:

For the destruction or damaging of standing timber or other property in order to provide a firebreak;

For damage resulting from the release of waters or the breach of impoundments in order to reduce pressure or other danger from actual or threatened flood; or

Beyond the extent of funds available for such compensation.

Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 58-2-101 — 58-2-132 (Acts 1943, ch. 46, § 1; Acts 1943, ch. 85, § 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 5755.22, 5755.27 (Williams, § 5755.29); Acts 1951, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2, 4-17 (Williams, §§ 5755.39, 5755.40, 5755.42-5755.55); Acts 1955, ch. 167, § 2-5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1968, ch. 479, § 1-6; Acts 1969, ch. 188, § 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1975, ch. 54, §§ 4-9; 1976, ch. 541, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 303, § 17-19; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 7-601 — 7-605, 7-607 — 7-633; Acts 1981, ch. 336, §§ 1-5; Acts 1982, ch. 939, § 3; Acts 1983, ch. 429, §§ 21,22; Acts 1984, ch. 723, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111), concerning general emergency provisions, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1. For current provisions, see this part.

Cross-References. Eminent domain by public agencies, title 29, ch. 17.